Massachusetts, session 194th, S2865.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 69 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 1T the following new section:-
Section 1U. School Library Standards
As used in this section, (i) the term “school library standards” shall mean the most recent
edition of academic standards for school library media programs developed by the American
Association of School Librarians (AASL) and endorsed for the commonwealth by the
Massachusetts School Library Association (MSLA); (ii) the term “effective school library
program” shall mean school library programs that are staffed by certified school librarians, offer
equitable access to a collection and other resources for all students, and that provide personalized
learning environments for students within instruction time and across the school day; (iii) the
term “schools” shall mean all public schools, charter schools, private day schools, residential
schools, and collaborative schools established and recognized under this Title.
of 2

Pursuant to the provisions of section 1D, the department shall adopt AASL and MSLA
school library standards that promote effective school library programs, including, but not
limited to: (a) a well-rounded grade-appropriate collection that supports the curriculum as well as
independent reading and inquiry; (b) the teaching of information literacy and research skills for
students in kindergarten to grade 12; (c) standards that further reading proficiency and
competencies for all students; and (d) standards that integrate learning technologies across the
curriculum. Pursuant to the provisions of section 1E, the commissioner shall guide school
committees or boards of trustees in implementation of standards and the development of
effective school library programs. School committees or board of trustees may incorporate the
school library standards into existing curricula including, but not limited to, English language
arts, history and social sciences, and technology.
SECTION 2. The department shall conduct a study relative to the implementation of the
school library standards established in Section 1 no later than December 31, 2029 and every third
year thereafter, subject to appropriation. The department shall submit a written report of its
findings from each study with the Clerks of the Senate and the House of Representatives and the
Senate and House Chairs of the Joint Committee on Education no later than December 31, 2029
and on December 31 of every third year thereafter, subject to appropriation. Such reports shall
include, but not be limited to, a study of employment of school librarians and staff and the type
of school library programs being offered in schools to students and best practices and
recommended improvements to effective school library programs for all students.
of 2